California, session 20252026, SB1403.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 650 of the Unemployment Insurance Code is amended to read:650. “Employment” does not include services performed as a real estate, mineral, oil and gas, or cemetery broker or as a real estate, cemetery cemetery, or direct sales salesperson, or a yacht broker or salesman, by an individual if all of the following conditions are met:(a) The individual is licensed under the provisions of Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 9600) of Division 3 of, or Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of, the Business and Professions Code, Article 2 (commencing with Section 700) of Chapter 5 of Division 3 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, or is engaged in the trade or business of primarily inperson demonstration person-to-person sales activities, including demonstrations and sales presentation presentations of consumer products, including services or other intangibles, in the home home, door-to-door, telephonically, or online, or sales to any buyer on a buy-sell basis, a deposit-commission basis, or any similar basis, for resale by the buyer or any other person in the home or otherwise than from a contractually required retail or wholesale establishment.(b) Substantially all of the remuneration (whether remuneration, whether or not paid in cash) cash, for the services performed by that individual is directly related to sales or other output (including output, including the performance of services) services, rather than to the number of hours worked by that individual.(c) The services performed by the individual are performed pursuant to a written contract between that individual and the person for whom the services are performed and the contract provides that the individual will not be treated as an employee with respect to those services for state tax purposes.(d) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision shall not apply to any provision that cross-references this section other than Section 2783 of the Labor Code.SECTION 1.Section 671 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:671.(a)An insurer issuing an automobile collision policy, as defined in Section 660, or a policy for comprehensive coverage for an automobile, as defined in Section 11580.07, shall not refuse to issue the policy of insurance, or the policy in combination with other coverages, when the refusal is based solely on the age of the automobile to be insured, if the market value of the automobile exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).(b)This section does not apply to any policy that includes coverage for losses resulting from wear and tear or from normal deterioration of an automobile or its component parts, nor to any policy that provides coverage for an antique or classic automobile.